Hawaii statutes.
C. Hawaiian Language College

[§304A-1301] Hawaiian language college;
establishment. There shall be a Hawaiian language college at the
University of Hawaii at Hilo. The college shall provide a Hawaiian liberal
education program providing education primarily through the Hawaiian language.
[L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next